Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-235
Resignation of registered agent.

(MBCA 5.03) (a) A registered
agent may resign the agent's appointment by signing and delivering to the
Secretary of State for filing the signed original and two exact or conformed
copies of a statement of resignation. The statement may include a statement
that the registered office is also discontinued.

(b) After filing the statement
the Secretary of State shall mail one copy to the registered office, if not
discontinued, and the other copy to the corporation at its principal office.

(c) The agency appointment
is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the
thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 35.